West Virginia, session 2026, HB4705.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-2-47. Requiring a moment of silence. (a) The West Virginia Legislature finds that in today’s hectic society that too few persons are able to experience even a moment of quiet reflection before plunging headlong into the activities of daily life. Young persons are particularly affected by the absence of an opportunity for a moment of quiet reflection. The West Virginia Legislature finds that our youth, and society as a whole, would be well served if students in the public schools were afforded a moment of silence at the beginning of each school day.(b) The principal of each public school shall require teachers at the beginning of the day in all grades to set aside at least one minute, but not more than two minutes, daily, for a moment of silence, during which students may not interfere with other students’ participation. A teacher may not make suggestions as to the nature of any reflection that a student may engage in during the moment of silence.(c) Each classroom teacher shall encourage parents or guardians to discuss the moment of silence with their children and to make suggestions as to the best use of this time.